Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 2.1. Lobbying.

§§ 30-28.01 through 30-28.9:1.

Repealed by Acts 1994, c. 857, effective April 20, 1994, and c. 937.

Cross references.

For present provisions on lobbying, see §§

2.2-418

through

2.2-435

.

Editor’s note.

Section 38-28.1:1 was also repealed by Acts 1994, c. 915.

Section 30-28.5:1 was amended by Acts 1994, c. 101, effective March 16, 1994, to April 20, 1994, before the repeal of the section by Acts 1994, c. 857, became effective.